Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.211

Application of chapter—2009 c 120.

The authority of this chapter remains in effect, whether such a licensee, individual, or person subject to chapter 120, Laws of 2009 acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state, or claims to act without such an authority.

[ 2009 c 120 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.